Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
PROMOTION OF PROFESSIONAL REVIEW ACTIVITIES

[§671D-10] Limitation of damages for
professional review actions. (a) If a professional review action of a
professional review body meets all the standards specified in section
671D-11(a) except as provided in section 671D-11(b):

(1) The professional review body;

(2) Any person acting as a member or staff to the
body;

(3) Any person under a contract or other formal
agreement with the body; and

(4) Any person who participates with or assists the body
with respect to the action;

shall not be liable in damages under any law of the
State with respect to the action except laws relating to the civil rights of
any person or persons, including chapter 378, part I. Nothing in this
subsection shall prevent the State from bringing an action, including an
antitrust action under chapter 480, where such an action is otherwise
authorized.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, no person, whether as a witness or otherwise, providing information
to a professional review body regarding the competence or professional conduct
of a physician shall be held, by reason of having provided such information, to
be liable in damages under any law of the State unless such information is
false and the person providing it knew that such information was false. [L
1989, c 354, pt of §3 and c 363, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next